Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-115
Criminal offense against a pregnant woman; enhanced penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who commits any of the following criminal offenses against a pregnant woman shall be punished by the imposition of the next higher penalty classification than the penalty classification prescribed for the criminal offense:

(a) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;

(b) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;

(c) Assault in the third degree, section 28-310;

(d) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;

(e) Sexual assault in the first degree, section 28-319;

(f) Sexual assault in the second or third degree, section 28-320;

(g) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree, section 28-319.01;

(h) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree, section 28-320.01;

(i) Sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the first degree, section 28-322.02;

(j) Sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the second degree, section 28-322.03;

(k) Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the first or second degree, section 28-322.04;

(l) Sexual abuse of a detainee in the first or second degree, section 28-322.05;

(m) Sexual abuse by a conservator, guardian, or guardian ad litem in the first or second degree, section 28-322.06;

(n) Sexual abuse by a child welfare service provider in the first or second degree, section 28-322.07;

(o) Domestic assault in the first, second, or third degree, section 28-323;

(p) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the first degree, section 28-929;

(q) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the second degree, section 28-930;

(r) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the third degree, section 28-931;

(s) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle, section 28-931.01;

(t) Assault by a confined person, section 28-932;

(u) Confined person committing offenses against another person, section 28-933; and

(v) Proximately causing serious bodily injury while operating a motor vehicle, section 60-6,198.

(2) The enhancement in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any criminal offense listed in subsection (1) of this section that is already punishable as a Class I, IA, or IB felony. If any criminal offense listed in subsection (1) of this section is punishable as a Class I misdemeanor, the penalty under this section is a Class IIIA felony.

(3) The prosecution shall allege and prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the victim was pregnant at the time of the offense.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB771, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB141, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB519, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 5.
July 18, 2026